Indiana, session 2026, SB84.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-14-31-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 6. Not later than April 1, 2026, the office of
the secretary shall apply to the United States Department of Health
and Human Services to amend the state plan for the federal Child
Care and Development Fund voucher program to increase the
maximum initial eligibility limit for purposes of initial eligibility to
one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty level.
SECTION 2. IC 12-14-31-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7. (a) Beginning April 1, 2026, the office of
the secretary shall fully fund:
(1) each applicant eligible for a CCDF voucher payment; and
(2) eligible CCDF provider reimbursement rates in an amount
equal to or greater than the reimbursement rates established
by the office of the secretary for CCDF providers that were in
effect on January 1, 2025.
2026 IN 84—LS 6425/DI 152


(b) The office of the secretary may not place an applicant
eligible for a CCDF voucher payment on a waiting list.
SECTION 3. IC 12-17.2-7.2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 121, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. As used in this chapter,
"eligible child" refers to an individual who:
(1) in the case of an individual who is enrolled before May 1,
2025:
(A) (1) is at least four (4) years of age and less than five (5)
years of age on August 1 of the state fiscal year for which a
grant is sought under the prekindergarten program;
(B) (2) is a resident of Indiana or otherwise has legal
settlement in Indiana, as determined under IC 20-26-11;
(C) (3) is a member of a household with an annual income that
does not exceed one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the
federal poverty level;
(D) (4) receives qualified early education services from an
eligible provider, as determined by the office;
(E) (5) has a parent or guardian who participates in a parental
engagement and involvement component provided by the
eligible provider;
(F) (6) has a parent or guardian who agrees to ensure that the
child meets the attendance requirements determined by the
office; and
(G) (7) meets the requirements under section 7.2(a) and 7.2(c)
of this chapter. and
(2) in the case of an individual who is enrolled on or after May 1,
2025:
(A) is at least four (4) years of age and less than five (5) years
of age on August 1 of the state fiscal year for which a grant is
sought under the prekindergarten program;
(B) is a resident of Indiana or otherwise has legal settlement in
Indiana, as determined under IC 20-26-11;
(C) is a member of a household with an annual income that
does not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the
federal poverty level;
(D) receives qualified early education services from an eligible
provider, as determined by the office;
(E) has a parent or guardian who participates in a parental
engagement and involvement component provided by the
eligible provider;
(F) has a parent or guardian who agrees to ensure that the child
2026 IN 84—LS 6425/DI 152


meets the attendance requirements determined by the office;
and
(G) meets the requirements under section 7.2(a) and 7.2(c) of
this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 12-17.2-7.2-7.2, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7.2. (a) For an eligible child to qualify for a
prekindergarten voucher under this chapter, the eligible child must
reside with a parent or guardian who is:
(1) working or attending a job training or an educational program;
or
(2) actively seeking employment, subject to the approval by
the United States Department of Health and Human Services
as provided in 45 CFR 98.21.
(b) For a limited eligibility child to qualify for a prekindergarten
voucher under this chapter, the limited eligibility child must reside with
a parent or guardian who:
(1) is working or attending a job training or an educational
program; or
or
(2) receives Social Security Disability Insurance, Supplemental
Security Income benefits, or disability benefits from the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(3) is actively seeking employment, subject to the approval by
the United States Department of Health and Human Services
as provided in 45 CFR 98.21.
(c) Before the office may provide a prekindergarten voucher to an
eligible child, a limited eligibility child, or a child of a child care
employee under this chapter, the office shall require that a parent or
guardian of the child agree to the following:
(1) The child will attend the prekindergarten program of an
eligible provider selected by the parent or guardian for the full
duration of the prekindergarten program year.
(2) The parent or guardian will not transfer to another
prekindergarten program during the prekindergarten program
year.
(3) The child will attend the prekindergarten program at least
eighty-five percent (85%) of the days that the prekindergarten
program is provided.
(4) The parent or guardian will allow the child to participate in an
external evaluation conducted by researchers, including the
2026 IN 84—LS 6425/DI 152


kindergarten readiness assessment and measuring of
developmental and academic progress.
(5) The parent or guardian will participate in family engagement
and involvement activities offered by the selected prekindergarten
program, including meetings with the child's teacher to discuss
the child's progress or any other conference concerning the child
that is requested by the eligible provider.
(6) The parent or guardian will complete the necessary forms for
the child to receive a student test number from the department of
education.
(7) The parent or guardian will send the child to kindergarten.
(8) The parent or guardian will read to the child each week.
(9) Any other condition the office determines is appropriate.
(d) Priority shall be given to a child of a child care employee under
this section.
(e) Priority may be given to an eligible or limited eligibility child
under this section if a parent or guardian of the eligible or limited
eligibility child is:
(1) involved in activities that improve the parent's or guardian's
education; or
(2) involved in job training.
SECTION 5. IC 12-17.2-7.2-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2024,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. (a) The office shall determine:
(1) which applicants shall be provided a:
(A) prekindergarten voucher under this chapter; or
(B) grant under section 7.4 of this chapter; and
(2) subject to subsection (b) and to the availability of funding, the
amount of each prekindergarten voucher or grant.
(b) At least five percent (5%) but not more than fifty percent (50%)
of the:
(1) tuition for eligible or limited eligibility children under the
prekindergarten program; or
(2) expansion plan described in section 7.4(a) of this chapter;
during the state fiscal year must be paid from donations, gifts, grants,
bequests, and other funds received from a private entity or person, from
the United States government, or from other sources (excluding funds
from a prekindergarten voucher or grant provided under this chapter
and excluding other state funding). The office may receive and
administer grants on behalf of the prekindergarten program. The grants
shall be distributed by the office to fulfill the requirements of this
subsection.
2026 IN 84—LS 6425/DI 152


(c) The amount of a prekindergarten voucher provided under the
prekindergarten program to an eligible child, a limited eligibility child,
or a child of a child care employee:
(1) who attends a prekindergarten program full time must equal
at least two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) during the
state fiscal year; and
(2) may not exceed six thousand eight hundred dollars ($6,800)
from state money provided under this chapter during the state
fiscal year.
SECTION 6. IC 12-17.2-7.2-8.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8.3. The office may not set a
cap on the number of prekindergarten vouchers available to
eligible children or limited eligibility children of less than seven
thousand five-hundred (7,500) per state fiscal year.
SECTION 7. IC 12-17.2-7.2-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 15. The office shall establish
reimbursement rates for prekindergarten program providers in an
amount equal to or greater than the reimbursement rates
established by the office for prekindergarten providers that were
in effect on January 1, 2025.
SECTION 8. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) There is
continuously appropriated to the prekindergarten program fund
established by IC 12-17.2-7.2-13.5 from the state general fund for
the state fiscal year beginning after:
(1) June 30, 2026, and ending before July 1, 2027; and
(2) June 30, 2027, and ending before July 1, 2028;
an amount sufficient to carry out the purposes of the
prekindergarten program fund.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 9. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) There is
continuously appropriated to the office of the secretary of family
and social services from the state general fund for the state fiscal
year beginning after:
(1) June 30, 2026, and ending before July 1, 2027; and
(2) June 30, 2027, and ending before July 1, 2028;
an amount sufficient to carry out the requirements under
IC 12-14-31-6 and IC 12-14-31-7.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 10. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 84—LS 6425/DI 152